el: Υλικό κατασκευής αξεσουάρ: Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Χαρτόνι; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Άλλο
sv: Tillbehör - material: Aluminium; Bambu; Kartong; Glas; Metall; Papper; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Trä; Övrigt
fr: Matériau de l’accessoire: Aluminum; Bambou; Papier carton; Verre; Métal; Papier; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Bois; Autre
zh-TW: 配件材質: 鋁; 竹子; 紙板; 玻璃; 金屬; 紙; 塑膠; 橡膠; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 木材; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal od kojeg je izrađen dodatak: Aluminij; Bambus; Karton; Staklo; Metal; Papir; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
en: Accessory material: Aluminum; Bamboo; Cardboard; Glass; Metal; Paper; Plastic; Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Wood; Other
pl: Materiał akcesorium: Aluminium; Bambus; Tektura; Szkło; Metal; Papier; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Drewno; Inne
ru: Материал аксессуара: Алюминий; Бамбук; Картон; Стекло; Металл; Бумага; Пластик; Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Дерево; Другое
fi: Tarvikkeiden materiaali: Alumiini; Bambu; Pahvi; Lasi; Metalli; Paperi; Muovi; Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Puu; Muu
it: Materiale accessorio: Alluminio; Bamboo; Cartone; Vetro; Metallo; Carta; Plastica; Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Legno; Altro
nl: Accessoire materiaal: Aluminium; Bamboe; Karton; Glas; Metaal; Papier; Plastic; Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Hout; Andere
pt-BR: Material do acessório: Alumínio; Bambu; Cartão; Vidro; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
ro-RO: Material accesoriu: Aluminiu; Bamboo; Carton; Sticlă; Metal; Hârtie; Plastic; Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Lemn; Altele
lt-LT: Priedo medžiaga: Aliuminis; Bambukas; Kartonas; Stiklas; Metalas; Popierius; Plastikas; Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Mediena; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на аксесоарите: Алуминий; Бамбук; Картон; Стъкло; Метал; Хартия; Пластмаса; Каучук; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Дърво; Други
da: Materiale til tilbehør: Aluminum; Bambus; Pap; Glas; Metal; Papir; Plast; Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Træ; Andet
de: Zubehörmaterial: Aluminium; Bambus; Karton; Glas; Metall; Papier; Kunststoff; Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Holz; Sonstiges
th: วัสดุอุปกรณ์เสริม: อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; กระดาษลัง; แก้ว; โลหะ; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ja: アクセサリー素材: アルミニウム; バンブー; 段ボール; ガラス; 金属; 紙; プラスチック; ゴム; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; 木材; その他
sl-SI: Material v dodatkih: Aluminij; Bambus; Karton; Steklo; Kovina; Papir; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Les; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu phụ kiện: Nhôm; Tre; Bìa cứng; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Giấy; Nhựa; Cao su; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Gỗ; Khác
zh-CN: 配件材质: 铝; 竹子; 纸板; 玻璃; 金属; 纸张; 塑料; 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 木头; 其他
hu: Tartozék anyaga: Alumínium; Bambusz; Karton; Üveg; Fém; Papír; Műanyag; Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Fa; Egyéb
ko: 액세서리 소재: 알루미늄; 대나무; 판지; 유리; 금속; 종이; 플라스틱; 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 목재; 기타
tr: Aksesuar yapımı: Alüminyum; Bambu; Kalın karton; Cam; Metal; Kağıt; Plastik; Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
es: Material de accesorios: Aluminio; Bambú; Cartón; Vidrio; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Goma; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Madera; Otros
nb: Tilbehørsmateriale: Aluminium; Bambus; Papp; Glass; Metall; Papir; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Trevirke; Annet
cs: Materiál doplňku: Hliník; Bambus; Lepenka; Sklo; Kov; Papír; Plast; Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo: Hliník; Bambus; Kartón; Sklo; Kov; Papier; Plast; Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Drevo; Iné
pt-PT: Material dos acessórios: Alumínio; Bambu; Cartão; Vidro; Metal; Papel; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro